District of Columbia statutes.
47-1701

Repealed

Examinations of books and persons; failure to obey summons or produce books; prosecutions.

Repealed.

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 673, ch. 690, title I, § 1
May 16, 1938, 52 Stat. 356, ch. 223, § 1
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(a), (b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, 573, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a), (c)(49)(A)
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 18(a), 34 DCR 850
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(v)(2), 48 DCR 334
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”
1973 Ed., § 47-1401.
1981 Ed., § 47-1701.